Nevada, session 83, SB437.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 675 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. To the extent not preempted by federal law, any contract
between an Internet consumer lender and a resident of this State
for the provision of a loan must:
(a) Provide that the contract is governed by the laws of this
State; and
(b) Require that any litigation, arbitration or other process for
the resolution of disputes arising out of the contract occur in this
State.
2. Any condition, stipulation or provision in a contract
between an Internet consumer lender and a resident of this State
for the provision of a loan that conflicts with the provisions of this
section is contrary to public policy and is void and unenforceable.
Sec. 2. NRS 675.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
675.020 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires:
1. “Amount of cash advance” means the amount of cash or its
equivalent actually received by a borrower or paid out at his or her
direction or on his or her behalf.
2. “Amount of loan obligation” means the amount of cash
advance plus the aggregate of charges added thereto pursuant to
authority of this chapter.
3. “Breach of the security of the computerized data system” or
“breach” means the unauthorized acquisition of computerized data
from the computerized data system of the licensee that compromises
the security, confidentiality or integrity of personal information
maintained by the licensee. The term does not include the good faith
acquisition of personal information by an employee or agent of a
licensee for a legitimate purpose of the licensee, so long as the
personal information is not used for a purpose unrelated to the
licensee or subject to further authorized disclosure.
4. “Business of lending in this State” means that a person:
(a) Solicits loans in this State or makes loans to persons in this
State, unless these are isolated, incidental or occasional transactions;
or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(b) Is located in this State and solicits loans outside of this State
or makes loans to persons located outside of this State, unless these
are isolated, incidental or occasional transactions.
5. “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Financial
Institutions.
6. “Community” means a contiguous area of the same
economic unit or metropolitan area as determined by the
Commissioner, and may include all or part of a city or several towns
or cities.
7. “Computerized data system” means a system of software,
hardware or firmware, including, without limitation, a system of
web-based applications, that:
(a) Is owned, leased or licensed by a licensee;
(b) Is located at the place of business of the licensee or hosted
remotely; and
(c) Stores or provides access to personal information, financial
information or other data related to borrowers or potential
borrowers.
8. “Consumer credit” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 604A.036.
9. “Covered service member” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 604A.038.
10. “Dependent” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 604A.057.
11. “Internet business lender” means a person who makes
business loans exclusively through the Internet.
12. “Internet consumer lender” means a person who makes,
solicits, brokers, arranges or facilitates consumer loans
exclusively through the Internet.
13. “License” means a license, issued under the authority of
this chapter, to make loans in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter, at a single place of business.
[13.] 14. “Licensee” means a person to whom one or more
licenses have been issued.
[14.] 15. “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and
Registry” or “Registry” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 604A.083.
[15.] 16. “Personal information” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 603A.040.
[16.] 17. “Remote location” means a location other than an
office or place of business for which a license has been issued
pursuant to this chapter and at which an employee of a licensee
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
engages in the business of lending in this State pursuant to NRS
675.2965 to 675.299, inclusive.
Sec. 3. NRS 675.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
675.090 1. Application for a license must be in writing, under
oath, and in the form prescribed by the Commissioner.
2. The application must:
(a) Provide the address of the office or other place of business
for which the application is submitted.
(b) Contain such further relevant information as the
Commissioner may require, including the names and addresses of
the partners, officers, directors or trustees, and of such of the
principal owners or members as will provide the basis for the
investigations and findings contemplated by NRS 675.110 and
675.120.
3. A person may apply for a license for an office or other place
of business located outside this State from which the applicant will
conduct business in this State if:
(a) The applicant is an Internet business lender or Internet
consumer lender; or
(b) The applicant or a subsidiary or affiliate of the applicant has
a license issued pursuant to this chapter for an office or other place
of business located in this State.
4. A person who wishes to apply for a license pursuant to
subsection 3 must submit with the application for a license a
statement signed by the applicant which states that the applicant
agrees to:
(a) Make available at a location within this State the books,
accounts, papers, records and files of the office or place of business
located outside this State to the Commissioner or a representative of
the Commissioner; or
(b) Pay the reasonable expenses for travel, meals and lodging of
the Commissioner or a representative of the Commissioner incurred
during any investigation or examination made at the office or place
of business located outside this State.
 The person must be allowed to choose between paragraph (a) or
(b) in complying with the provisions of this subsection.
5. The Commissioner shall consider an application to be
withdrawn if the Commissioner has not received all information and
fees required to complete the application within 6 months after the
date the application is first submitted to the Commissioner or within
such later period as the Commissioner determines in accordance
with any existing policies of joint regulatory partners. If an
application is deemed to be withdrawn pursuant to this subsection or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
if an applicant otherwise withdraws an application, the
Commissioner may not issue a license to the applicant unless the
applicant submits a new application and pays any required fees.
Sec. 4. NRS 675.230 is hereby amended to read as follows:
675.230 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and
3, a licensee may not conduct the business of making loans under
this chapter within any office, suite, room or place of business in
which any other business is solicited or engaged in, except an
insurance agency or notary public, or in association or conjunction
with any other business, unless authority to do so is given by the
Commissioner.
2. A licensee may conduct the business of making loans
pursuant to this chapter in the same office or place of business as a
mortgage company if:
(a) The licensee and the mortgage company:
(1) Operate as separate legal entities;
(2) Maintain separate accounts, books and records;
(3) Are subsidiaries of the same parent corporation; and
(4) Maintain separate licenses; and
(b) The mortgage company is licensed by this state pursuant to
chapter 645B of NRS and does not receive money to acquire or
repay loans or maintain trust accounts as provided by
NRS 645B.175.
3. A licensee who is an Internet business lender or Internet
consumer lender may conduct the business of making loans
pursuant to this chapter within any office, suite, room or place of
business in which any other business is solicited or engaged in.
Sec. 5. The amendatory provisions of this act do not apply to a
contract entered into before October 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)